Tennessee, session 114, HB1911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(i)
(1) Notwithstanding the restriction in subdivision (a)(2) limiting access to public
records to citizens of this state, an individual who is not a citizen of this state is entitled
to inspect or receive a copy of any law enforcement record or report pertaining solely to
that individual, including, but not limited to, an arrest report, incident report, crash report,
or citation, if the individual submits:
(A) A written request identifying the specific record sought;
(B) A copy of a valid government-issued photo identification; and
(C) A signed affidavit affirming that the record requested pertains solely
to the individual requester.
(2) This subsection (i) does not authorize the release of a record that is
otherwise confidential by law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1911
011282
- 1 -